Utah statutes.
36-20-4.   Review of rules -- Criteria.
The committee shall review and evaluate submissions of court rules or
proposals for court rules and may review existing court rules, based on the
following criteria:
(1)  whether or not they are authorized by the state constitution or by
statute;
(2)  whether or not those authorized by statute comply with legislative
intent;
(3)  whether or not they are in conflict with existing statute or govern the
same policy as articulated in statute;
(4)  whether or not they are primarily substantive or procedural in nature;
(5)  whether or not they infringe upon the powers of the executive or
legislative branch of government;
(6)  their impact on affected persons;
(7)  their purpose or the reason for the change;
(8)  the anticipated cost or savings to:
(a)  the state budget;
(b)  local governments; and
(c)  individuals; and
(9)  the compliance cost for affected persons.
